Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-174.06
Planning director; prepare comprehensive plan; review by county planning commission; county board; adopt or modify plan.

The planning director shall be responsible for preparing a comprehensive plan of the county and amendments and extensions thereto, and for submitting such plans and modifications to the county planning commission for its consideration and action. The commission shall review such plans and modifications, and those which the county board may suggest, and, after holding at least one public hearing on each proposed action, shall provide its recommendations to the county board of commissioners within a reasonable period of time. The county board of commissioners shall review the recommendations of the planning commission and, after at least one public hearing on each proposed action, shall adopt or reject such plans in whole or in part and with or without modifications.

Laws 1961, c. 87, § 11, p. 305;

Laws 1975, LB 111, § 4.